Utah statutes.
57-8a-202.   Unpaid assessment -- Costs and attorney fees.

(1)  An association may recover all expenses incurred by the association in collecting an unpaid assessment, including reasonable attorney fees.

(2) (a)  An association may maintain an action to recover a money judgment for an unpaid assessment without foreclosing or waiving the lien securing the unpaid assessment.

(b)  The prevailing party in an action described in Subsection (2)(a) may recover:

(i)  costs; and

(ii)  reasonable attorney fees.

